Idaho, session 2025, H0070.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-2340, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.